California statutes. Public Resources Code
(10) The expected number of trainees and direct full-time employees likely to be engaged for each LEA’s annual funding commitments based upon a formula to be made available by the Energy Commission or California Workforce Investment Board. The formula shall be stated as labor-intensities per total project dollar expended, and may differentiate by type of
 improvement, equipment, or building trade involved.

(11) The ability of the project to enhance workforce development and employment opportunities, utilize members of the California Conservation Corps, certified local conservation corps, Youth Build, veterans, Green Partnership Academies, nonprofit organizations, high school career technical academies, high school regional occupational programs, or state-certified apprenticeship programs, or to accommodate learning opportunities for school pupils or at-risk youth in the community.

(f) The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall not distribute funds to an LEA unless the LEA has submitted to the Energy Commission, and the Energy Commission has approved, an expenditure plan that outlines the energy projects to be funded. An LEA shall utilize a simple form expenditure plan developed by the Energy Commission. The Energy Commission
 shall promptly review the plan to ensure that it meets the criteria specified in this section and in the guidelines developed by the Energy Commission. A portion of the funds may be distributed to an LEA upon request for energy audits and other plan development activities prior to submission of the plan.

(g) This section shall not affect the eligibility of any eligible entity awarded a grant pursuant to this section to receive other incentives available from federal, state, and local government, or from public utilities or other sources, or to leverage the grant from this section with any other incentive.

(h) Any limitation of funds awarded to individual projects pursuant to this chapter shall not preclude or otherwise limit the total amount of funds that a recipient LEA or community college may otherwise be eligible to receive as a result of identifying multiple projects that
 meet the overall objectives and criteria described in this chapter.

(i) For a school facility that is not publicly owned, an LEA receiving moneys pursuant to this chapter for a project for that facility shall require that the school repay to the state all moneys received from the Job Creation Fund for the project if the school voluntarily vacates the facility within five years of project completion. The facility owner shall repay to the state all moneys received from the Job Creation Fund for the project if the school was forced to vacate the facility within the life of the project completion. All benefits of these public funds should be received by the school utilizing the facility.

(j) It is the intent of the Legislature that monetary savings at eligible institutions from retrofit and installation projects pursuant to this section be used to benefit students and learning at
 those institutions.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 250, Sec. 19.   (AB 129)   Effective September 16, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

26237.

The Energy Commission shall maintain information on the local education agencies and community college districts that receive grants, loans, or other financial assistance under this chapter. The publicly available and searchable database shall include relevant metrics, to be determined by the Energy Commission, for electric, gas, and cost savings of the projects.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 29, Sec. 2.   (SB 73)   Effective June 27, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

26240.

(a) To later quantify the costs and benefits of funded projects, an entity that receives funds from the Job Creation Fund or pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 26227.2 shall authorize its local electric and gas utilities to provide 12 months of past and ongoing usage and billing records at the school facility site level to the Energy Commission.

(b) As a condition of receiving funds from the Job Creation Fund or pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 26227.2, not sooner than one year but no later than 15 months after an entity completes its first eligible project with a grant, loan, or other assistance from the Job Creation Fund or pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 26227.2, the entity shall submit a report of its project expenditures to the Citizens Oversight Board created pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 26210). To the extent practical, this report shall also contain information on any of the following:

(1) The total final gross project cost before deducting any incentives or other grants and the percentage of total project cost derived from the Job Creation Fund or pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 26227.2.

(2) The estimated amount of energy saved, accompanied by specified energy consumption and utility bill cost data for the individual facility where the project is located, in a format to be specified by the Energy Commission.

(3) The nameplate rating of new clean energy generation installed.

(4) The number of trainees.

(5) The number of direct full-time equivalent employees and the average number of months or years of utilization of each of these employees.

(6) The
 amount of time between awarding of the financial assistance and the completion of the project or training activities.

(7) The entity’s energy intensity before and after project completion, as determined from an energy rating or benchmark system, to be determined by the Energy Commission, such as the United States Environmental Protection Agency’s Energy Star system or other acceptable benchmarking approach that may be available from local utilities, the American Society for Heating, Refrigerating, and Air-Conditioning Engineers, Inc., or a publicly available building analysis software as is appropriate to the size, budget, and expertise available to the school.

(c) If an LEA completes more than one project, the required information for a second and any subsequent project shall be submitted no later than the first full quarter following project completion.

(d) To minimize the calculation burden on LEAs, the Energy Commission shall develop a method to utilize the data submitted by each recipient LEA in its project reports, such as utility consumption data, building operating characteristics, and other information, to calculate for each project, LEA, or the state as a whole the actual or estimated energy and cost savings. This method shall include a means to combine gas and electric savings into a combined cost of saved energy factor and to report on other economic and investment performance metrics. The Energy Commission shall prepare an annual summary of the expenditures, energy savings, effective cost of saved energy or return on investment, and employment effects of each year’s completed projects, and shall provide this report to the Citizens Oversight Board.

(e) The California Workforce Investment Board, in consultation with the
 Energy Commission, shall utilize the reports filed with the Citizens Oversight Board to quantify total employment affiliated with funded projects, as well as to estimate new trainee, apprentice, or full-time jobs resulting from Job Creation Fund activity or from funds appropriated pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 26227.2. The California Workforce Investment Board shall prepare a report with this information annually and submit it to the Citizens Oversight Board.

(f) The Citizens Oversight Board shall report the information it receives pursuant to subdivisions (a) to (e), inclusive, to the Legislature as part of its responsibilities pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 26210. The Citizens Oversight Board’s report shall be submitted annually and posted on a publicly accessible Internet Web site.

(g) Funding provided to LEAs pursuant to this chapter is subject to annual audits required by Section 41020 of the Education Code. Funding provided to
 community college districts pursuant to this chapter is subject to annual audits required by Section 84040 of the Education Code.

(h) (1) The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall require local educational agencies to pay back funds if they are not used in accordance with state statute or regulations, if a project is torn down or remodeled, or if the property is deemed to be surplus and sold prior to the payback of the project.

(2) The Chancellor of the California Community Colleges shall require a community college to pay back funds if they are not used in accordance with state statute or regulations, if a project is torn down or remodeled, or if the property is deemed to be surplus and sold prior to the payback of the project.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 55, Sec. 12.   (SB 110)   Effective July 10, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 16.5. ENERGY AND RESOURCES FUND [26400. - 26406.]

26400.

There is in the State Treasury the Energy and Resources Fund, which fund is hereby created.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 899, Sec. 8.   Effective September 17, 1980.)
-------------------------------------------

26401.

(a) Within the Energy and Resources Fund there is hereby created the Energy Account and the Resources Account. The annual budget document shall propose and the annual Budget Bill shall allocate and divide the money in the fund between such accounts.

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature that funds from the Energy and Resources Fund be used only for short-term projects and not for any ongoing programs. 

(c) Moneys in the Energy Account may be appropriated by the Legislature solely for energy projects and programs deemed appropriate by the Legislature.

(d) All appropriations from the Energy Account or the Resources Account shall be made by the annual Budget Bill.

(e) In applying the provisions of this section to the selection of individual energy programs and projects for funding, priority shall be given to those programs and projects which best fulfill all of the following criteria:

(1) Have the greatest potential for reducing the use of oil and natural gas to produce energy.

(2) Have the greatest potential for transferability and widespread use throughout the state by the year 1990.

(3) Have the highest degree of feasibility.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 899, Sec. 8.   Effective September 17, 1980.)
-------------------------------------------

26403.

Programs and projects eligible for funding from the Resources Account shall be limited to any of the following:

(1) Appropriations to the State Coastal Conservancy for grants to public and private agencies for the restoration of urban waterfronts, as described in “An Urban Waterfronts Program for California” required by Chapter 1040 of the Statutes of 1981. Appropriations to the conservancy may include, but shall not be limited to, particular projects identified in that report.

(2) Projects under the Roberti-Z’berg Urban Open-Space and Recreation Program Act (Chapter 3.2 (commencing with Section 5620) of Division 5 of the Public Resources Code).

(3) Appropriations to the State Coastal Conservancy for grants to public and private agencies for acquisition, development, rehabilitation, restoration, operation, and maintenance of real property and facilities which provide public access ways to or along the coast or the shoreline of San Francisco Bay.

(4) Wetland protection, preservation, restoration, and enchancement projects in accordance with the Keene-Nejedly California Wetlands Preservation Act (Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 5810) of Division 5 of the Public Resources Code), or, in accordance with provisions governing the State Coastal Conservancy (Division 21 (commencing with Section 31000) of the Public Resources Code).

(5) Restoration, enhancement, and preservation of wildlife habitat on federal lands pursuant to the Sikes Act (16 U.S.C. Sec. 670a, et seq.).

(6) Acquisition and development of real property for wildlife management in accordance with the purposes of the Wildlife Conservation Law of 1947 (Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 1300) of Division 2 of the Fish and Game Code).

(7) Reforestation, urban forestry, and forest improvement projects in accordance with the provisions of Part 2.5 (commencing with Section 4790) of Division 4 of the Public Resources Code.

(8) Water reclamation, watershed management, water conservation, instream use, and drainage management programs approved by the Director of Water Resources or the State Water Resources Control Board.

(9) Watershed restoration, erosion control, fire hazard reduction, land conservation, and fish and wildlife habitat improvement projects.

(10) Acquisition, restoration, and preservation of habitat for rare and endangered species.

(11) Programs for the prevention of soil loss and soil degradation.

(12) Programs for the preservation and protection of prime agricultural lands. 

(13) Shoreline erosion control projects.

(14) Mitigation of environmental damage resulting from gas or oil production on state lands.

(15) Programs to develop a computer-based mapping system to store, refine, analyze, and display resource data.

(16) Programs for development and enhancement of renewable agricultural resources.

(17) Programs to safeguard public and environmental health from hazardous materials.

(18) Programs for geothermal resources assessment.

(19) Other programs which enhance and conserve renewable and nonrenewable resources.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1618, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

26404.

The provisions of Sections 26401 to 26403, inclusive, shall not apply to appropriations and expenditures from the Energy and Resources Fund for fiscal year 1980–81. Such provisions shall apply beginning with fiscal year 1981–82 and for each fiscal year thereafter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 899, Sec. 8.   Effective September 17, 1980.)
-------------------------------------------

26406.

The Director of Finance shall cause all moneys in the Energy and Resources Fund which are in excess of current requirements to be invested and reinvested from time to time in securities described in Section 16430 of the Government Code, and such securities may be sold or exchanged if in his opinion such sale or exchange is in the best interests of the state in effectuating the purposes of this chapter. All income derived from such investment, reinvestment, sale, or exchange shall be credited to the Energy and Resources Fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 899, Sec. 8.   Effective September 17, 1980.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 17. GEOLOGIC HAZARD ABATEMENT DISTRICTS [26500. - 26654.]



CHAPTER 1. Definitions [26500. - 26512.]

26500.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions set forth in this chapter govern the construction of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 1118.)
-------------------------------------------

26501.

“Board of directors” means the governing body of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 1118.)
-------------------------------------------

26502.

“Bonds” means bonds, notes, or other evidence of indebtedness issued by a district pursuant to this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 1118.)
-------------------------------------------

26503.

“Local agency” means a city, a city and county, or a county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 1118.)
-------------------------------------------

26504.

“Clerk”, where not otherwise modified, means the clerk of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 1118.)
-------------------------------------------

26505.

“Improvement” means any activity that is necessary or incidental to the prevention, mitigation, abatement, or control of a geologic hazard, including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(a) Acquisition of property or any interest therein.

(b) Construction.

(c) Maintenance, repair, or operation of any improvement.

(d) Preparation of geologic reports required pursuant to Section 2623 for multiple projects within an earthquake fault zone or zones.

(e) Issuance and servicing of bonds, notes, or debentures issued to finance the costs of the improvements specified in subdivisions (a), (b), (c), and (d).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 916, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

26506.

“District” means a geologic hazard abatement district created pursuant to this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 1118.)
-------------------------------------------

26507.

“Geologic hazard” means an actual or threatened landslide, land subsidence, soil erosion, earthquake, fault movement, or any other natural or unnatural movement of land or earth.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 916, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

26508.

“Legislative body” means the legislative body of a local agency.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 1118.)
-------------------------------------------

26509.

“Plan of control” means a report prepared by an engineering geologist certificated pursuant to Section 7822 of the Business and Professions Code or a firm of engineering geologists which describes in detail a geologic hazard, its location and the area affected thereby, and a plan for the prevention, mitigation, abatement, or control thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 1118.)
-------------------------------------------

26510.

“Section”, unless otherwise modified, refers to a section of the Public Resources Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 1118.)
-------------------------------------------

26511.

“State” means the State of California and, where the context requires, any agency or instrumentality thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 1118.)
-------------------------------------------

26512.

“Treasurer” means the treasurer of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 1118.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2. District Formation [26525. - 26567.]



  ARTICLE 1. Purpose [26525. - 26525.]

26525.

A geologic hazard abatement district may be formed pursuant to this division for the following purposes:

(a) Prevention, mitigation, abatement, or control of a geologic hazard.

(b) Mitigation or abatement of structural hazards that are partly or wholly caused by geologic hazards.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 916, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Lands Included [26530. - 26534.]

26530.

The lands included within a district may be contiguous or noncontiguous.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 1118.)
-------------------------------------------

26531.

The lands included within a district may be situated in more than one local agency.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 1118.)
-------------------------------------------

26532.

The lands included within a district may be publicly or privately owned.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 1118.)
-------------------------------------------

26533.

No parcel of real property shall be divided by the boundaries of the proposed district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 1118.)
-------------------------------------------

26534.

All lands included within a district shall be specially benefitted by construction proposed in a plan of control approved by the legislative body.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 1118.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Initiation of Proceedings [26550. - 26560.]

26550.

The provisions of this chapter shall be inoperative as to a legislative body unless and until the legislative body adopts a resolution declaring that it is subject to its provisions and has forwarded a copy of such resolution to the State Controller.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 1118.)
-------------------------------------------

26550.5.

Proceedings for the formation of a district may be initiated by either of the following methods:

(a) A petition signed by owners of not less than 10 percent of the real property to be included within the proposed district.

(b) By resolution of the legislative body.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 1118.)
-------------------------------------------

26551.

If the territory proposed to be included within a district is located in more than one local agency, the legislative body of the local agency wherein lies the greater amount of assessed valuation of real property as shown on the assessment roll last equalized by the county, shall initiate and conduct the proceedings to form a district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 1118.)
-------------------------------------------

26552.

A petition initiating proceedings for formation of a district may be presented to the clerk of the legislative body, and shall contain substantially all of the following:

(a) A statement that the petition is made pursuant to this division.

(b) An indication, opposite each signature, of the lot, tract, and map number or other legal description sufficient to identify such signature as that of the owner of land within the territory included within the proposed district.

(c) An indication, opposite each signature, of the date each signature was affixed to the petition.

(d) A legal description and map of the boundaries of the territory to be included within the proposed district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 1118.)
-------------------------------------------

26553.

A plan of control shall be attached to the petition.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 1118.)
-------------------------------------------

26554.

Upon receipt of a petition in the form described in Sections 26550.5, 26551, and 26553, the clerk of the legislative body shall place such petition on the agenda for the regular meeting of the legislative body next following the clerk’s determination that such petition is substantially in the form described in Sections 26551 and 26552 and upon verification that the signatures affixed to the petition represent owners of not less than 10 percent of the real property to be included within the proposed district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 1118.)
-------------------------------------------

26555.

No petition shall be accepted by the clerk of the legislative body unless the signatures thereon shall have been secured within 120 days of the date on which the first signature on the petition was affixed and such petition is submitted to the clerk within 30 days after the last signature was affixed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 1118.)
-------------------------------------------

26556.

The clerk of the legislative body shall notify the person whose signature first appears on the petition of any irregularity in the petition. Such notification shall be by certified mail with return receipt requested. Within 10 days of the date of such mailing, a supplemental petition curing any irregularity may be submitted to the clerk.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 1118.)
-------------------------------------------

26557.

Upon presentation to the legislative body of a petition in the form prescribed by Sections 26551 and 26552, the legislative body shall adopt a resolution setting a public hearing on such petition and directing notice thereof to be mailed to all owners of real property to be included within the proposed district as shown on the assessment roll last equalized by the county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 1118.)
-------------------------------------------

26558.

A resolution of the legislative body intiating proceedings for the formation of a district shall contain substantially the following:

(a) A statement that the resolution is made pursuant to this division.

(b) A statement that the legislative body has been presented with and has reviewed a plan of control, and has determined that the health, safety, and welfare require formation of a district.

(c) The setting of a public hearing on such determination and directing that notice be mailed to all owners of real property included within the proposed district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 1118.)
-------------------------------------------

26559.

All activities of a local agency taken pursuant to this division for the formation of a district or the annexation of territory thereto are specific actions necessary to prevent or mitigate an emergency within the meaning of paragraph (4) of subdivision (b) of Section 21080.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 1118.)
-------------------------------------------

26560.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, proceedings for the formation of a district pursuant to this division are exclusive.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 1118.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Notice and Hearing [26561. - 26567.]

26561.

Notice of the hearing set pursuant to Section 26557 or subdivision (c) of Section 26558 shall be mailed first-class, postage prepaid, in the United States mail, at least 20 days preceding the date of the public hearing, to each owner of real property within the proposed district as shown on the last equalized county assessment roll, or the State Board of Equalization assessment roll, as the case may be.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 128, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

26562.

A copy of the petition described in Section 26552 or the resolution described in Section 26558 shall be attached to the notice.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 1118.)
-------------------------------------------

26563.

The notice shall set forth the time, date, and place of the hearing, briefly describe the purpose thereof, and indicate where the plan of control may be reviewed or duplicated, at a cost not to exceed the cost of duplication. The notice shall also set forth the address where objections to the proposed formation may be mailed or otherwise delivered up to and including the time of the hearing.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 714, Sec. 377.)
-------------------------------------------

26564.

At any time not later than the time set for hearing objections to the proposed formation, any owner of real property within the proposed district may make a written objection to the formation. Such objection shall be in writing, shall contain a description of the land by lot, tract, and map number, and shall be signed by such owner. Objections shall be mailed or delivered as specified in the notice described in Section 26561. If the person whose signature appears on such objection is not shown on the assessment roll last equalized by the county as the owner of the subject real property, the written objection shall be accompanied by evidence sufficient to indicate that such person is the owner of such property. The determination by the legislative body of ownership for purposes of this section shall be final and conclusive.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 1118.)
-------------------------------------------

26565.

At the time set for hearing objections, the legislative body shall be presented with all objections made pursuant to Section 26564. The legislative body may adjourn such hearing from time to time, but not to exceed 60 days from the date specified in the original notice.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 1118.)
-------------------------------------------

26566.

If it appears at the hearing that owners of more than 50 percent of the assessed valuation of the proposed district object to the formation thereof, the legislative body shall thereupon close the hearing and direct that proceedings for the formation of a district be abandoned.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 1118.)
-------------------------------------------

26567.

At the close of the hearing or within 60 days thereafter, the legislative body may proceed by resolution to order the formation of the proposed district. The resolution shall appoint five owners of real property within the district to the initial board of directors for terms not to exceed four years, or, as an alternative to the appointment of five owners of real property within the district, the legislative body may appoint itself to act as the board of directors. If the legislative body appoints itself as the board of directors, Section 26583 shall not apply. If owners of real property within the district are appointed as the initial board of directors, then following the initial term, the board of directors shall be elected as provided by Section 26583. This section shall apply to all districts formed on or after January 1, 1980.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1226, Sec. 23.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2.3. District Dissolution [26567.1. - 26567.3.]

26567.1.

(a) The legislative body may, by resolution, order the dissolution of a district formed under this division. Any resolution ordering a dissolution is valid only if the legislative body, based on substantial evidence on the record, makes one or more of the following findings:

(1) The corporate powers have not been used, there is a reasonable probability that those powers will not be used in the future, and the district holds no significant liquid assets.

(2) The board of directors, by resolution passed by unanimous vote of the directors, or by a vote of the owners of more than 50 percent of the assessed valuation of the real property in the district, approved the dissolution of the district.

(3) The district has not levied or collected any assessments and holds no significant liquid assets.

(4) The district has not substantially complied with a material condition of the resolution of formation adopted by the legislative body.

(b) If the board of directors is comprised of members of the legislative body, the decision of the board to dissolve a district shall be approved by the owners of more than 50 percent of the assessed valuation of the real property in the district within 90 days after a valid resolution ordering dissolution.

(c) A legislative body or a board of directors shall adopt a resolution setting a public hearing on the proposed dissolution and directing that notice shall be sent to the last known address of each homeowner within the district. The notice shall include the date, time, and place of the hearing and include a copy of the proposed resolution ordering dissolution. The notice shall be mailed first-class, postage prepaid, in the United States mail and be postmarked no later than 30 days prior to the date of the hearing. The notice shall also set forth the address where written objections to the dissolution of the district may be mailed or otherwise delivered up to and including the time of the hearing.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 806, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

26567.2.

In dissolution proceedings, the legislative body may dispense with the resolution and plan of control required by Sections 26553, 26558, and 26562. After the dissolution of the district, the legislative body shall assume all remaining responsibilities and obligations of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 806, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

26567.3.

Within 90 days after a dissolution, the board of directors shall return any liquid assets of the district to the landowners and local agencies in the same proportion that they have contributed to the revenue of the district, and shall provide by resolution for the distribution for ownership of any capital improvements and assets of the district. Within 90 days of a valid resolution ordering dissolution, any property owner within the district may offer an alternative plan for the distribution for ownership of any capital improvements and real assets of the district which shall be adopted if approved by the owners of more than 50 percent of the assessed valuation of the real property in the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 806, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2.5. Emergency Formation [26568. - 26569.7.]



  ARTICLE 1. Initiation of Proceedings [26568. - 26568.3.]

26568.

The procedures for initiation of proceedings, notice, and hearing and formation of a district under this chapter shall be alternative to the procedures in Articles 3 (commencing with Section 26550) and 4 (commencing with Section 26561) of Chapter 2. Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 26570) does not apply to districts formed under this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 555, Sec. 2.   Effective July 18, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

26568.1.

Proceedings for the formation of a district for any of the work specified in Section 26525 may be initiated by a petition signed by two-thirds of the property owners of the real property to be included within the proposed district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 555, Sec. 2.   Effective July 18, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

26568.2.

A petition initiating proceedings for the formation of a district under this chapter shall contain substantially all of the following:

(a) A statement that the petition is made pursuant to this chapter.

(b) An indication, opposite each signature, of the lot, tract, and map number, or other legal description sufficient to identify the signature as that of the owner of land within the proposed district.

(c) The reasons necessitating the creation of the district under this chapter. 

(d) A request that the time set for hearings on the formation of the district be on short notice and the reason or reasons for the request.

(e) A description of, or proposal for, work to be done, an estimate of the cost of the work, and proposed assessments.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 555, Sec. 2.   Effective July 18, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

26568.3.

(a) Upon presentation to the legislative body of a petition in the form prescribed by Section 26568.2, the legislative body shall adopt a resolution setting a public hearing on short notice on the petition and directing that notice of the hearing be given as provided in Section 26569. However, notice of the hearing shall be omitted if the hearing of objections is not required as provided in subdivision (b). The hearing shall be set no earlier than 15 days after the adoption of the resolution under this subdivision.

(b) The hearing of objections shall not be required if the legislative body, when considering the passage of a resolution of intention pursuant to a petition presented pursuant to Section 26568.1, finds and determines by a four-fifths vote of all members thereof, that all of the owners of lots or lands liable to be assessed have signed and filed a petition with the clerk on or before the day that the resolution of intention is to be considered for passage, waiving the hearing, declaring that they do not have any objections to the proposed work or the formation of the district, and requesting that the hearings of objections not be required.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 555, Sec. 2.   Effective July 18, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Notice and Hearing [26569. - 26569.4.]

26569.

Notice of the hearing on short notice set pursuant to Section 26568.3 shall be as follows:

(a) Published notice shall be made pursuant to Section 6061 of the Government Code and shall be completed at least 10 days prior to the date of the hearing. Published notice shall include a copy of the petition described in Section 26568. 2.

(b) Mailed notice shall be sent by first-class mail, with return receipt requested, and postmarked not less than 10 days preceding the date of the public hearing. A copy of the petition described in Section 26568.2 shall be attached to the notice.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 555, Sec. 2.   Effective July 18, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

26569.1.

At any time no later than the time set for hearing, any owner of real property within the proposed district may file with the clerk, a written protest to the formation of the district. A written protest shall contain a description of the land by lot, tract, and map number and shall be signed by the owner.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 555, Sec. 2.   Effective July 18, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

26569.2.

At the time set for hearing objections, the legislative body shall be presented with all objections made pursuant to Section 26568.1.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 555, Sec. 2.   Effective July 18, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

26569.3.

If it appears at the hearing that the owners of more than one-third of the real property to be included within the proposed district object to the formation thereof, the proceedings for the formation of the district shall be abandoned.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 555, Sec. 2.   Effective July 18, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

26569.4.

If a protest by the owners of more than one-third of the real property to be included in the district has not been filed, the legislative body may adopt a resolution ordering the improvements and the formation of the assessment district. If the legislative body proposes to levy an assessment, the notice, protest, and hearing procedures shall comply with Section 53753 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 262, Sec. 32.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Nature of the District [26569.5. - 26569.7.]

26569.5.

A district formed under this chapter shall be comprised of an area within a local agency that is specially benefited by, and is subject to a special assessment to pay the cost of, an improvement. The district is not an entity separate and distinct from the local agency within which it is formed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 538, Sec. 582.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

26569.6.

The legislative body shall appoint itself to act as board of directors of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 555, Sec. 2.   Effective July 18, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

26569.7.

This chapter is applicable only in a city or county which has adopted an ordinance providing that the chapter is applicable in its jurisdiction.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 555, Sec. 2.   Effective July 18, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3. Nature and Powers of the District [26570. - 26586.]



  ARTICLE 1. Nature of the District [26570. - 26573.]

26570.

A district is a political subdivision of the state. A district is not an agency or instrumentality of a local agency.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 1118.)
-------------------------------------------

26571.

A district is comprised of an area specially benefited by and subject to special assessment to pay the cost of an improvement. While a district performs certain governmental and proprietary functions as a political subdivision of the state, it is not a special district within the meaning of Section 56036 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1599, Sec. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

26573.

The powers of a district are vested in the board of directors.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 1118.)
-------------------------------------------


